Missouri, session 2026, HB2473.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 339.105, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 339.105, to read as follows:
339.105. 1. Each broker who holds funds belonging to another shall maintain such
funds in a separate bank account in a financial institution which shall be designated an escrow
or trust account. This requirement includes funds in which he or she may have some future
interest or claim. Such funds shall be deposited promptly unless all parties having an interest
in the funds have agreed otherwise in writing. No broker shall commingle his or her personal
funds or other funds in this account with the exception that:
(1) A broker may deposit and keep a sum not to exceed one thousand dollars in the
account from his or her personal funds, which sum shall be specifically identified and
deposited to cover service charges related to the account; and
(2) A broker may keep in the account any interest accrued on the funds in the
account payable to the broker as long as any payment of such interest is withdrawn
from the account within thirty days of receipt.
2. Each broker shall notify the commission of his or her intent not to maintain an
escrow account, or the name of the financial institution in which each escrow or trust account
is maintained, the name and number of each such account, and shall file written authorization
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2473 2
directed to each financial institution to allow the commission or its authorized representative
to examine each such account; such notification and authorization shall be submitted on
forms provided therefor by the commission. A broker shall notify the commission within ten
business days of any change of his or her intent to maintain an escrow account, the financial
institution, account numbers, or change in account status.
3. In conjunction with each escrow or trust account a broker shall maintain books,
records, contracts and other necessary documents so that the adequacy of said account may be
determined at any time. The account and other records shall be provided to the commission
and its duly authorized agents for inspection at all times during regular business hours at the
broker's usual place of business.
4. Whenever the ownership of any escrow moneys received by a broker pursuant to
this section is in dispute by the parties to a real estate sales transaction, the broker shall report
and deliver the moneys to the state treasurer within three hundred sixty-five days of the date
of the initial projected closing date in compliance with sections 447.500 to 447.595. The
parties to a real estate sales transaction may agree in writing that the funds are not in dispute
and shall notify the broker who is holding the funds.
5. A broker shall not be entitled to any money or other money paid to him or her in
connection with any real estate sales transaction as part or all of his or her commission or fee
until the transaction has been consummated or terminated, unless agreed in writing by all
parties to the transaction.
6. When, through investigations or otherwise, the commission has reasonable cause to
believe that a licensee has acted, is acting or is about to act in violation of this section, the
commission may, through the attorney general or any assistants designated by the attorney
general, proceed in the name of the commission to institute suit to enjoin any act or acts in
violation of this section.
7. Any such suit shall be commenced in either the county in which the defendant
resides or in the county in which the defendant has acted, is acting or is about to act in
violation of this section.
8. In such proceeding, the court shall have power to issue such temporary restraining
or injunction orders, without bond, which are necessary to protect the public interest. Any
action brought under this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other provisions
of this chapter. In such action, the commission or the state need not allege or prove that there
is no adequate remedy at law or that any individual has suffered any economic injury as a
result of the activity sought to be enjoined.
✔